src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection for Mansi

## Copula

## Stems ending in C

**LEXICON V_U** 

**LEXICON V_A** 

* **LEXICON V11_MUTUAL** 
	* **LEXICON V11_MUTUAL-IND**  
	* **LEXICON V11_MUTUAL-COND** 
	* **LEXICON V11_MUTUAL-IMPRT**  
	* **LEXICON V11_MUTUAL-PASS**  

* **LEXICON V11_even** pointing to
+Inf:%>аӈкве K ;
V11_MUTUAL ;

**LEXICON V12_odd** pointing to V11_odd

	* **LEXICON V12_even**  to V11_even

	* **LEXICON V13_odd**  to V11_odd

**LEXICON V13_even** to V11_even

**LEXICON V14_odd** to V11_odd

**LEXICON V15_odd** to V11_odd

**LEXICON V15_even** to V11_even

**LEXICON V16_odd** to V11_odd

**LEXICON V16_even** 

**LEXICON V21_odd** to V11_odd but with ы, а to V11_MUTUAL-COND

**LEXICON V21_even** to V11_even

**LEXICON V22_even** contains all forms

**LEXICON V23_odd** is the lexicon, pointing to
* V11_odd ; 
* :%>ы V11_MUTUAL-COND ; 
* :%>а V11_MUTUAL-COND ; 

**LEXICON V23_even** to V21_even

**LEXICON V25_odd** to V23_odd

**LEXICON V26_odd** contains all forms

**LEXICON V26_even** contains all forms

**LEXICON V27_odd** contains all forms

**LEXICON V28_odd** contains all forms

**LEXICON V31_odd** to V11_odd

**LEXICON V31_even** to V11_even and with ы, а to V11_MUTUAL-COND

**LEXICON V33_odd** to V11_odd and with ы, а to V11_MUTUAL-COND

**LEXICON V33_even** to V11_even and with ы, а to V11_MUTUAL-COND

**LEXICON V35_odd** to V11_odd and with ы, а to V11_MUTUAL-COND

**LEXICON V35_even** to V11_even and with ы, а to V11_MUTUAL-COND

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
